Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.039

Publication, sale, and distribution of code and supplements—Contracts or other arrangements.

The committee may enter into contracts or otherwise arrange for the publication and/or distribution, provided for in RCW 1.08.038, with or without calling for bids, by the department of enterprise services, upon specifications formulated under the authority of RCW 1.08.037, and upon such basis as the committee deems to be most expeditious and economical. Any such contract may be upon such terms as the committee deems to be most advantageous to the state and to potential purchasers of such publications. The committee shall fix terms and prices for such publications.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 301; 1955 c 235 s 8; 1953 c 257 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.